Hawaii statutes.
§480-23.2 Use immunity. The testimony
or production that is compelled under the order, and any information directly
or indirectly derived from the testimony or production, may not be used against
the person in any manner in a criminal case, except in a prosecution for
perjury, for giving a false statement, or for an offense involving a failure to
comply with the order; provided that such person may be prosecuted or punished
for any crime so long as testimony or production that is compelled under the order,
and any information directly or indirectly derived from such testimony or
production, is not used against such person in such prosecution. [L 1980, c
173, §4]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next